Colorado, session 2026A, HB1135.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds that Coloradans deserve access to personal care products that are safe,
advertised transparently, and free from hidden health risks.
(2) The general assembly further finds that certain hair products,
including hair relaxers and hairpieces, are disproportionately marketed to
and used by communities that have historically faced elevated exposure to
harmful chemicals and related health disparities.
(3) The general assembly further finds that consistency in warning
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

label requirements for similar products benefits both consumers and
manufacturers by promoting clarity and reducing unnecessary burdens. In
developing these requirements, it is the intent of the general assembly that
Colorado establish its own requirements that:
(a) Meet or exceed comparable consumer protection standards; and
(b) Align with applicable federal law and guidance, including new
or updated classifications of the International Agency for Research on
Cancer established by the World Health Organization, the secretary of the
federal department of health and human services, the United States
environmental protection agency, and other applicable agencies.
(4) The general assembly therefore determines that it is essential to
promote informed consumer choice, advance public health, and encourage
safer product formulation by ensuring clear and consistent disclosure when
hair relaxer products and hairpiece products contain chemicals known to
cause cancer or reproductive harm.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25-5-429 as
follows:
25-5-429. Chemicals used in hair relaxers and hairpieces -
warning labels - deceptive trade practice - short title - definitions.
(1) THE SHORT TITLE OF THIS SECTION IS THE "HAIR PRODUCT
TRANSPARENCY AND SAFETY ACT".
(2) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "CARCINOGEN" MEANS A CHEMICAL IDENTIFIED AS:
(I) A "GROUP 1 CARCINOGEN" OR "GROUP 2A CARCINOGEN" BY THE
INTERNATIONAL AGENCY FOR RESEARCH ON CANCER ESTABLISHED BY THE
WORLD HEALTH ORGANIZATION;
(II) A "KNOWN TO BE A HUMAN CARCINOGEN" OR "REASONABLY
ANTICIPATED TO BE A HUMAN CARCINOGEN" BY THE SECRETARY OF THE
FEDERAL DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES PURSUANT TO THE
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1135

FEDERAL "PUBLIC HEALTH SERVICE ACT", 42 U.S.C. SEC. 241 (b)(4); OR
(III) A "GROUP A CARCINOGEN" OR "GROUP B CARCINOGEN" BY THE
UNITED STATES ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY.
(b) "CHEMICAL" MEANS A SUBSTANCE WITH A DISTINCT MOLECULAR
COMPOSITION OR A GROUP OF STRUCTURALLY RELATED SUBSTANCES AND
INCLUDES THE BREAKDOWN PRODUCTS OF THE SUBSTANCE OR SUBSTANCES
THAT FORM THROUGH DECOMPOSITION, DEGRADATION, OR METABOLISM.
(c) "COVERED HAIR PRODUCT" MEANS A HAIR RELAXER PRODUCT OR
A HAIRPIECE PRODUCT.
(d) "HAIRPIECE PRODUCT" MEANS A HAIR EXTENSION, A WIG, OR
OTHER HAIRPIECE PRODUCT, INCLUDING DECORATIVE HAIR ADORNMENTS.
(e) "HAIR RELAXER PRODUCT" MEANS A PRODUCT TOPICALLY
APPLIED TO HAIR FOR THE PURPOSES OF WEAKENING THE STRUCTURE AND
CURLINESS OF THE HAIR FIBER AND ALLOWING FOR A STRAIGHTENING OF THE
HAIR.
(f) (I) "INTENTIONALLY ADDED" MEANS A CHEMICAL THAT IS
PURPOSEFULLY INTRODUCED TO A COVERED HAIR PRODUCT BY A
MANUFACTURER AND THAT REMAINS IN THE COVERED HAIR PRODUCT AS
SOLD, OFFERED FOR SALE, OR DISTRIBUTED IN THE STATE IN A
CONCENTRATION GREATER THAN ONE HUNDRED PARTS PER MILLION OR
ABOVE A THRESHOLD IDENTIFIED BY AN ENTITY DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION
(2)(a) OR (2)(i) OF THIS SECTION AS INJURIOUS TO HUMAN HEALTH,
WHICHEVER IS LOWER.
(II) "INTENTIONALLY ADDED" DOES NOT INCLUDE THE INCIDENTAL
PRESENCE OF A CHEMICAL.
(g) "INCIDENTAL PRESENCE" MEANS THE UNINTENTIONAL PRESENCE
OF A CHEMICAL, AS A NONESSENTIAL RAW MATERIAL, A BYPRODUCT OF A
RAW MATERIAL, OR A PROCESSING AGENT, USED DURING THE
MANUFACTURING PROCESS OF A COVERED HAIR PRODUCT IF THE CHEMICAL
IS INHERENT TO OR RESULTS FROM THE MANUFACTURING PROCESS.
(h) (I) "MANUFACTURER" MEANS A PERSON THAT MANUFACTURES
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1135

A COVERED HAIR PRODUCT OR WHOSE BRAND NAME IS AFFIXED TO A
COVERED HAIR PRODUCT.
(II) "MANUFACTURER" INCLUDES, IN THE CASE OF A COVERED HAIR
PRODUCT THAT IS IMPORTED INTO THE UNITED STATES, THE IMPORTER OR
FIRST DOMESTIC DISTRIBUTOR OF THE COVERED HAIR PRODUCT IF THE
PERSON THAT MANUFACTURES THE COVERED HAIR PRODUCT OR WHOSE
BRAND NAME IS AFFIXED TO THE COVERED HAIR PRODUCT DOES NOT HAVE
A PRESENCE IN THE UNITED STATES.
(i) "REPRODUCTIVE TOXICANT" MEANS A CHEMICAL IDENTIFIED AS
A REPRODUCTIVE OR A DEVELOPMENTAL TOXICANT BY THE CENTER FOR THE
EVALUATION OF RISKS TO HUMAN REPRODUCTION ESTABLISHED BY THE
NATIONAL TOXICOLOGY PROGRAM.
(3) (a) ON AND AFTER JULY 1, 2027, A MANUFACTURER SHALL NOT
SELL, OFFER FOR SALE, OR DISTRIBUTE A COVERED HAIR PRODUCT IN THE
STATE, INCLUDING THROUGH AN INTERNET TRANSACTION, THAT CONTAINS
AN INTENTIONALLY ADDED CARCINOGEN OR A REPRODUCTIVE TOXICANT
UNLESS THE COVERED HAIR PRODUCT INCLUDES A CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS
WARNING LABEL OR, IN THE CASE OF AN INTERNET TRANSACTION, A CLEAR
AND CONSPICUOUS ONLINE WARNING STATEMENT THAT NOTIFIES THE
CONSUMER AT THE TIME OF SALE THAT THE COVERED HAIR PRODUCT
CONTAINS AN INTENTIONALLY ADDED CARCINOGEN OR REPRODUCTIVE
TOXICANT.
(b) THE CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS WARNING LABEL OR ONLINE
WARNING STATEMENT DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3)(a) OF THIS SECTION
MUST BE PRINTED IN NO LESS THAN SIZE TWELVE-POINT FONT AND MUST
STATE:
(I) IF THE COVERED HAIR PRODUCT CONTAINS AN INTENTIONALLY
ADDED CARCINOGEN, "THIS PRODUCT CONTAINS A CHEMICAL KNOWN TO
CAUSE CANCER";
(II) IF THE COVERED HAIR PRODUCT CONTAINS AN INTENTIONALLY
ADDED REPRODUCTIVE TOXICANT, "THIS PRODUCT CONTAINS A CHEMICAL
KNOWN TO CAUSE BIRTH DEFECTS OR OTHER REPRODUCTIVE HARM"; OR
(III) IF THE COVERED HAIR PRODUCT CONTAINS BOTH AN
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1135

INTENTIONALLY ADDED CARCINOGEN AND AN INTENTIONALLY ADDED
REPRODUCTIVE TOXICANT, "THIS PRODUCT CONTAINS CHEMICALS KNOWN TO
CAUSE CANCER AND BIRTH DEFECTS OR OTHER REPRODUCTIVE HARM".
(4) ON AND AFTER JULY 1, 2028, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY
ADOPT RULES UPDATING THE WARNING LABEL REQUIREMENT DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION.
(5) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION BY A MANUFACTURER
CONSTITUTES A DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE UNDER SECTION 6-1-105
(1)(rrrr).
(6) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A COVERED HAIR PRODUCT
THAT IS SOLD OR DISTRIBUTED TO A COMMERCIAL ENTITY FOR PROFESSIONAL
USE AND IS NOT OFFERED FOR RETAIL SALE TO A CONSUMER IN THE STATE.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-1-105, add (1)(rrrr)
as follows:
6-1-105. Unfair or deceptive trade practices - definitions.
(1) A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the
course of the person's business, vocation, or occupation, the person:
(rrrr) VIOLATES SECTION 25-5-429.
SECTION 4. Applicability. This act applies to conduct occurring
on or after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1135

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1135